Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-835
Severability.

If any provision of sections 76-825 to 76-894 or the application thereof to any person or circumstances is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of sections 76-825 to 76-894 which can be given effect without the invalid provisions or applications, and to this end the provisions of sections 76-825 to 76-894 are severable.

Laws 1983, LB 433, § 11.